Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.12.010

Created.

There is hereby created a program of financial aid to students pursuing a post-secondary education which shall be known as the state work-study program.

[ 1994 c 130 s 1; 1974 ex.s. c 177 s 1.]

NOTES:

Severability—1974 ex.s. c 177: "If any provision of this act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1974 ex.s. c 177 s 10.]